Maryland, session 2025, HB1433.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
3–8A–03.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1433*

HOUSE BILL 1433
(a) In addition to the jurisdiction specified in Subtitle 8 of this title, the court has
exclusive original jurisdiction over:
(1) A child:
(i) Who is at least 13 years old alleged to be delinquent; or
(ii) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, who is at least
10 years old alleged to have committed an act:
1. That, if committed by an adult, would constitute:
A. A crime of violence, as defined in § 14–101 of the Criminal
Law Article;
B. A crime involving handguns under § 4–203 or § 4–204 of
the Criminal Law Article;
C. A crime involving firearms under § 5–133, § 5–134, §
5–138, § 5–142, § 5–203, or § 5–703 of the Public Safety Article;
D. Aggravated cruelty to animals under § 10–606 of the
Criminal Law Article; or
E. Sexual offense in the third degree under § 3–307 of the
Criminal Law Article; or
2. Arising out of the same incident as an act listed in item 1
of this item;
(2) A child who is in need of supervision;
(3) A child who has received a citation for a violation;
(4) Except as provided in subsection [(d)(6)] (D)(4) of this section, a peace
order proceeding in which the respondent is a child; and
(5) Proceedings arising under the Interstate Compact on Juveniles.
(b) The court has concurrent jurisdiction over proceedings against an adult for
the violation of § 3–8A–30 of this subtitle. However, the court may waive its jurisdiction
under this subsection upon its own motion or upon the motion of any party to the
proceeding, if charges against the adult arising from the same incident are pending in the
criminal court. Upon motion by either the State’s Attorney or the adult charged under §
3–8A–30 of this subtitle, the court shall waive its jurisdiction, and the adult shall be tried
in the criminal court according to the usual criminal procedure.

HOUSE BILL 1433 3
(c) (1) The jurisdiction of the court is concurrent with that of the District Court
in any criminal case arising under the compulsory public school attendance laws of this
State.
(2) The jurisdiction of the court is concurrent with that of a federal court
sitting in the State over proceedings involving a violation of federal law committed by a
child on a military installation of the U.S. Department of Defense if:
(i) The federal court waives exclusive jurisdiction; and
(ii) The violation of federal law is also a crime under State law.
(d) The court does not have jurisdiction over:
(1) [A child at least 14 years old alleged to have done an act that, if
committed by an adult, would be a crime punishable by life imprisonment, as well as all
other charges against the child arising out of the same incident, unless an order removing
the proceeding to the court has been filed under § 4–202 of the Criminal Procedure Article;
(2)] A child at least 16 years old alleged to have done an act in violation of
any provision of the Transportation Article or other traffic law or ordinance, except an act
that prescribes a penalty of incarceration;
[(3)] (2) A child at least 16 years old alleged to have done an act in
violation of any provision of law, rule, or regulation governing the use or operation of a boat,
except an act that prescribes a penalty of incarceration;
[(4)] (3) A child at least 16 years old alleged to have committed any of the
following crimes, as well as all other charges against the child arising out of the same
incident, unless an order removing the proceeding to the court has been filed under §
4–202 of the Criminal Procedure Article:
(I) ANY CRIME PUNISHABLE BY LIFE IMPRISONMENT;
[(i) Abduction;
(ii) Kidnapping;
(iii)] (II) Second degree murder;
[(iv)] (III) Manslaughter, except involuntary manslaughter;
[(v)] (IV) Second degree rape;
[(vi) Robbery under § 3–403 of the Criminal Law Article;

HOUSE BILL 1433
(vii) Third degree sexual offense under § 3–307(a)(1) of the Criminal
Law Article;
(viii) A crime in violation of § 5–133, § 5–134, § 5–138, or § 5–203 of
the Public Safety Article;
(ix) Using, wearing, carrying, or transporting a firearm during and
in relation to a drug trafficking crime under § 5–621 of the Criminal Law Article;
(x) Use of a firearm under § 5–622 of the Criminal Law Article;
(xi)] (V) Carjacking or armed carjacking under § 3–405 of the
Criminal Law Article;
[(xii) Assault in the first degree under § 3–202 of the Criminal Law
Article;
(xiii)] (VI) Attempted murder in the second degree under § 2–206 of
the Criminal Law Article;
[(xiv)] (VII) Attempted rape in the second degree under § 3–310 of the
Criminal Law Article;
[(xv) Attempted robbery under § 3–403 of the Criminal Law Article;]
or
[(xvi)] (VIII) A violation of [§ 4–203,] § 4–204[, § 4–404, or § 4–405] of
the Criminal Law Article;
[(5) A child who previously has been convicted as an adult of a felony and is
subsequently alleged to have committed an act that would be a felony if committed by an
adult, unless an order removing the proceeding to the court has been filed under § 4–202 of
the Criminal Procedure Article;
(6)] (4) A peace order proceeding in which the victim, as defined in §
3–8A–01(cc)(1)(ii) of this subtitle, is a person eligible for relief, as defined in § 4–501 of the
Family Law Article; or
[(7)] (5) Except as provided in subsection (a)(1)(ii) of this section, a
delinquency proceeding against a child who is under the age of 13 years.
(e) If the child is charged with two or more violations of the Maryland Vehicle
Law, another traffic law or ordinance, or the State Boat Act, allegedly arising out of the
same incident and which would result in the child being brought before both the court and

HOUSE BILL 1433 5
a court exercising criminal jurisdiction, the court has exclusive jurisdiction over all of the
charges.
(f) A child under the age of 13 years may not be charged with a crime.
3–8A–27.
(a) (2) This subsection does not prohibit:
(iv) A law enforcement agency of the State or of a political subdivision
of the State, when necessary and for the sole purposes of facilitating apprehension of a child
and ensuring public safety, from releasing to the public photographs and identifying
information of a child who:
1. Has escaped from:
A. A detention center for juveniles;
B. A secure residential facility for juveniles; or
C. A correctional unit as defined in § 2–401 of the
Correctional Services Article;
2. Is a missing child as defined in § 9–401 of the Family Law
Article; or
3. The court does not have jurisdiction over pursuant to [§
3–8A–03(d)(1), (4), or (5)] § 3–8A–03(D)(3) of this subtitle and who is subject to:
A. Arrest; or
B. An arrest warrant issued by a criminal court.
Article – Criminal Procedure
4–202.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a court exercising criminal
jurisdiction in a case involving a child may transfer the case to the juvenile court before
trial or before a plea is entered under Maryland Rule 4–242 if:
(1) the accused child was at least 14 but not 18 years of age when the
alleged crime was committed;
(2) the alleged crime is excluded from the jurisdiction of the juvenile court
under [§ 3–8A–03(d)(1), (4), or (5)] § 3–8A–03(D)(3) of the Courts Article; and

HOUSE BILL 1433
(3) the court determines by a preponderance of the evidence that a transfer
of its jurisdiction is in the interest of the child or society.
(c) The court may not transfer a case to the juvenile court under subsection (b) of
this section if:
(1) the child was convicted in an unrelated case excluded from the
jurisdiction of the juvenile court under [§ 3–8A–03(d)(1) or (4)] § 3–8A–03(D)(3) of the
Courts Article; or
(2) the alleged crime is murder in the first degree and the accused child
was 16 or 17 years of age when the alleged crime was committed.
(i) (1) The provisions of § 3–8A–27 of the Courts Article relating to
confidentiality of records apply to all police records and court records concerning the child
excluded from the jurisdiction of the juvenile court under [§ 3–8A–03(d)(1), (4), or (5)]
§ 3–8A–03(D)(3) of the Courts Article from the time of the child’s arrest until:
(i) the time for filing of a motion to transfer to juvenile court under
the Maryland Rules has expired and no such motion has been filed; or
(ii) a motion to transfer to juvenile court has been denied.
(2) If a case is transferred to the juvenile court under this section:
(i) the provisions of § 3–8A–27 of the Courts Article relating to
confidentiality of records continue to apply to all police and court records concerning the
child; and
(ii) the criminal charge is subject to expungement under § 10–106 of
this article.
4–202.2.
(a) At sentencing, a court exercising criminal jurisdiction in a case involving a
child shall determine whether to transfer jurisdiction to the juvenile court if:
(1) as a result of trial or a plea entered under Maryland Rule 4–242, all
charges that excluded jurisdiction from the juvenile court under [§ 3–8A–03(d)(1) or (4)]
§ 3–8A–03(D)(3) of the Courts Article do not result in a finding of guilty; and
(2) (i) pretrial transfer was prohibited under § 4–202(c)(2) of this
subtitle; or
(ii) the court did not transfer jurisdiction after a hearing under §
4–202(b) of this subtitle.

HOUSE BILL 1433 7
10–215.
(a) The following events are reportable events under this subtitle that must be
reported to the Central Repository in accordance with § 10–214 of this subtitle:
(20) an adjudication of a child as delinquent[:
(i) if the child is at least 14 years old, for an act described in §
3–8A–03(d)(1) of the Courts Article; or
(ii)] if the child is at least 16 years old, for an act described in [§
3–8A–03(d)(4) or (5)] § 3–8A–03(D)(3) of the Courts Article;
10–216.
(d) (1) This subsection only applies to an adjudication of delinquency of a
child[:
(i) for an act described in § 3–8A–03(d)(1) of the Courts Article if the
child is at least 14 years old; or
(ii)] for an act described in [§ 3–8A–03(d)(4) or (5)] § 3–8A–03(D)(3)
of the Courts Article if the child is at least 16 years old.
(2) If a child has not been previously fingerprinted as a result of arrest for
the delinquent act, the court that held the disposition hearing of the child adjudicated
delinquent shall order the child to be fingerprinted by the appropriate and available law
enforcement unit.
(3) If the child cannot be fingerprinted at the time of the disposition
hearing held under paragraph (2) of this subsection, the court shall order the child to report
to a designated law enforcement unit to be fingerprinted within 3 days after making a
disposition on an adjudication of delinquency.
Article – Education
7–303.
(a) (6) “Reportable offense” means an offense that:
(i) Occurred off school premises;
(ii) Did not occur at an event sponsored by the school; and
(iii) Involved any of the following:

HOUSE BILL 1433
1. A crime of violence, as defined in § 14–101 of the Criminal
Law Article;
2. Any of the offenses enumerated in [§ 3–8A–03(e)(4)]
§ 3–8A–03(D)(3) of the Courts Article;
3. A violation of § 4–101, § 4–102, § 4–203, or § 4–204 of the
Criminal Law Article;
4. A violation of § 5–602, § 5–603, § 5–604, § 5–605, § 5–606,
§ 5–607, § 5–608, § 5–608.1, § 5–609, § 5–612, § 5–613, § 5–614, § 5–617, § 5–618, § 5–627,
or § 5–628 of the Criminal Law Article;
5. A violation of § 4–503, § 9–504, or § 9–505 of the Criminal
Law Article;
6. A violation of § 6–102, § 6–103, § 6–104, or § 6–105 of the
Criminal Law Article;
7. A violation of § 9–802 or § 9–803 of the Criminal Law
Article;
8. A violation of § 3–203 of the Criminal Law Article;
9. A violation of § 6–301 of the Criminal Law Article;
10. A violation of § 9–302, § 9–303, or § 9–305 of the Criminal
Law Article;
11. A violation of § 7–105 of the Criminal Law Article;
12. A violation of § 6–202 of the Criminal Law Article; or
13. A violation of § 10–606 of the Criminal Law Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any criminal prosecution or delinquency proceeding for any act committed
before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.